Illinois, session 104th, HB3146.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Property Tax Code is amended by changing 5Sections 21-90, 22-10, 22-40, and 22-65 and by adding Section 621-302 as follows: 7    (35 ILCS 200/21-90)8    Sec. 21-90. Purchase and sale by county; distribution of 9proceeds. 10    (a) When any property is offered for sale under any of the 11provisions of this Code, the county board of the county in 12which the property is located, in its discretion, may bid, or, 13in the case of forfeited property, may apply to purchase it or 14otherwise acquire the tax lien or certificate in the name of 15the county as trustee for all taxing districts having an 16interest in the property's taxes or special assessments for 17the nonpayment of which the property is sold. The presiding 18officer of the county board, with the advice and consent of the 19board, may appoint on its behalf some officer, person, or 20entity to attend such sales, bid on tax liens or certificates, 21and act on behalf of the county when exercising its authority 22under this Section, with reasonable costs and fees for such 23services paid from redemption interest and sales proceeds   HB3146- 2 -LRB104 11225 HLH 21307 b1arising from county certificates. The county shall apply on 2the bid or purchase the unpaid taxes and special assessments 3due upon the property. No cash need be paid. Under Sections 421-110, 21-115, 21-120, and 21-190, a county may bid or 5purchase tax certificates only in the absence of other 6bidders. 7    (b) The county, as trustee for all taxing districts having 8an interest in the property's taxes or special assessments, 9shall be the designated holder of all tax liens or 10certificates that are forfeited to the State or county. No 11cash need be paid for the forfeited tax lien or certificate. 12    (c) For any tax lien or certificate acquired under 13subsection (a) or (b) of this Section, the county may take 14steps necessary to acquire title to the property, including a 15final right of first refusal or final bid at the close of any 16public auction or judicial sale conveying title to the 17property, and may manage and operate the property, including, 18but not limited to, mowing of grass, removal of nuisance 19greenery, removal of garbage, waste, debris or other 20materials, or the demolition, repair, or remediation of unsafe 21structures. When a county, or other taxing district within the 22county, is a petitioner for a tax deed, no filing fee shall be 23required. When a county or other taxing district within the 24county is the petitioner for a tax deed, one petition may be 25filed including all parcels that are tax delinquent within the 26county or taxing district, and any publication made under   HB3146- 3 -LRB104 11225 HLH 21307 b1Section 22-20 of this Code may combine all such parcels within 2a single notice. The notice may include the property street 3address as listed on the most recent available tax bills, if 4available, and shall list the Property Index Number of the 5parcels for informational purposes. The county, as tax 6creditor and as trustee for other tax creditors, or other 7taxing district within the county, shall not be required to 8allege and prove that all taxes and special assessments which 9become due and payable after the sale or forfeiture to the 10county have been paid nor shall the county be required to pay 11the subsequently accruing taxes or special assessments at any 12time. The county board or its designee may prohibit the county 13collector from including the property in the tax sale of one or 14more subsequent years. The lien of taxes and special 15assessments which become due and payable after a sale to a 16county shall merge in the fee title of the county, or other 17taxing district within the county, on the issuance of a deed.18    The county may sell any property acquired with authority 19provided in this Section, or assign any tax certificate to any 20person or entity party, including, but not limited to, taxing 21districts, municipalities, land banks created pursuant to 22Illinois law, or non-profit developers focused on constructing 23affordable housing. 24    The assigned tax certificate shall be void with no further 25rights given to the assignee, including no right to refund or 26reimbursement, if a tax deed has not been recorded within 4   HB3146- 4 -LRB104 11225 HLH 21307 b1years after the date of the assignment unless a court extends 2the assignment period as provided in this Section. Upon a 3motion by the assignee, a court may toll the 4-year deadline 4for a specified period of time if the court finds the assignee 5is prevented from obtaining or recording a deed by injunction 6or order of any court, by the refusal or inability of any court 7to act upon the application for a tax deed, by a municipality's 8refusal to issue necessary transfer stamps or approvals for 9recording, or by the refusal of the clerk to execute the deed. 10If an assigned tax certificate is void under this Section, it 11shall be forfeited to the county and held as a valid 12certificate of sale in the county's name pursuant to this 13Section 21-90. The proceeds of any sale or assignment under 14this Section, less all costs of the county incurred in the 15acquisition, operation, maintenance, and sale of the property 16or assignment of the tax certificate, including all costs 17associated with county staff and overhead used to perform the 18duties of the trustee set forth in this Section, and less any 19surplus payments to owners, shall be distributed to the taxing 20districts in proportion to their respective interests therein.21    (d) When the county, as trustee, files one petition for 22more than one delinquent tax lien or certificate, the county 23may request, pursuant to Section 22-40, that the court issue a 24tax deed to the county, as trustee, without holding a judicial 25tax deed auction. If the county requests a tax deed without a 26judicial tax deed auction, the Order for Issuance of Tax Deed   HB3146- 5 -LRB104 11225 HLH 21307 b1shall identify the total amount of delinquent taxes and 2penalties, municipal advancements identified in Section 22-35, 3pro rata county costs incurred pursuant to subsections (a) 4through (c) of Section 21-90, and other posted costs for each 5parcel conveyed, and order the county to offer each parcel for 6sale at a public auction, as set forth in subsection (e), 7within 120 days of recording the tax deed.8    (e) Auctions held by a county pursuant to this Section 9shall conform with the following requirements.10        (1) The county or its agent shall give notice of the 11    auction with the following information:12            (A) the Property Identification Number and Address 13        listed on the latest tax bill;14            (B) the time and place of the auction;15            (C) the terms of the auction; and16            (D) the total amount of delinquent taxes and 17        penalties, municipal advancements identified in 18        Section 22-35, pro rata county costs incurred pursuant 19        to subsections (a) through (c) of Section 21-90, and 20        other posted costs.21        The notice of auction shall be mailed via first class 22    mail to all parties at the address at which service of 23    process was made. If service of process was made in any 24    manner other than by personal service, substitute service, 25    corporate service, or government service, notice shall be 26    mailed via first class mail to all addresses included in   HB3146- 6 -LRB104 11225 HLH 21307 b1    the notice served pursuant to Section 22-25. The notice 2    shall include a sworn certificate of service signed by the 3    party sending the notice attesting to the fact that the 4    notice of auction was placed in the mail at least 10 5    calendar days prior to the date of the auction. The notice 6    of auction shall be published at least 3 consecutive 7    calendar weeks (Sunday through Saturday), once in each 8    week, the first such notice to be published not more than 9    45 days prior to the auction, the last such notice to be 10    published not less than 7 days prior to the auction. If the 11    property is located in a municipality in a county with 12    less than 3,000,000 inhabitants, the county or its agent 13    shall also publish a notice in some newspaper published in 14    the municipality. If the petitioner cannot identify a 15    newspaper published in the municipality, or if the 16    property is located in a county with 3,000,000 or more 17    inhabitants, the notice shall be published in a newspaper 18    published within the county. If no newspaper is published 19    in the county, then the notice shall be published in the 20    newspaper that is published nearest the county seat of the 21    county in which the property is located. The publication 22    shall include all information included in the notice sent 23    pursuant to this Section.24        (2) The county may establish minimum bids at any 25    auction held pursuant to this Section, not to exceed the 26    total amount of delinquent taxes and penalties, municipal   HB3146- 7 -LRB104 11225 HLH 21307 b1    advancements identified in Section 22-35, pro rata county 2    costs incurred pursuant to subsections (a) through (c) of 3    Section 21-90, and other posted costs, for the auctioned 4    parcel, as identified in the Order for Issuance of Tax 5    Deed. For purposes of this section, "pro rata county costs 6    incurred pursuant to subsections (a) through (c) of 7    Section 21-90" may include costs incurred by the county in 8    filing one petition for more than one delinquent tax lien 9    or certificate and all costs related to the filing of the 10    one petition and obtaining tax deeds for the liens and 11    certificates identified in the one petition, reasonably 12    apportioned and included in the total costs for each 13    individual tax deed issued pursuant to the petition.14        (3) If an auction is postponed, adjourned, or 15    rescheduled to occur less than 60 days after the last 16    scheduled auction, the county shall announce the date, 17    time, and place upon which the adjourned auction shall be 18    held at the time, date, and location in the notice. The 19    County is not required to send additional notice of any 20    postponed auction as provided in item (1) of subsection 21    (e) of Section 21-90. Notwithstanding any provision of law 22    to the contrary, for auctions that are conducted more than 23    60 days after the date in the required notice, the county 24    shall send notice of the adjourned auction in accordance 25    with Section item (1) of subsection (e) of Section 21-90.26        (4) In auctions held pursuant to this Section, the   HB3146- 8 -LRB104 11225 HLH 21307 b1    county, as trustee, shall have a right of first refusal or 2    final bid at the close of any public auction. The county is 3    required to pay the full amount of any county bid that 4    exceeds the credit bid prior to the disbursement of 5    surplus funds in subsection (6) of this Section.6        (5) Failure to hold a public auction of the parcels 7    received within the 180-day period shall not affect the 8    validity of the recorded deed, the Order for Issuance of 9    Tax Deed, or otherwise affect the marketability of title.10        (6) To the extent that the winning bid at the auction 11    exceeds the amount of the tax deed judgment as defined in 12    subsection (d) of Section 21-90, the county trustee shall 13    deposit the surplus funds with the treasurer of the county 14    in which the subject property lies within 30 days. Within 15    60 days of the auction sale, the county, as trustee, shall 16    send a notice to interested parties in the underlying 17    case, stating that the owner is entitled to a distribution 18    of surplus proceeds and may file a claim pursuant to 19    subsection (i) of Section 22-40. 20    Under Sections 21-110, 21-115, 21-120, and 21-190, a 21county may bid or purchase only in the absence of other 22bidders.23(Source: P.A. 102-363, eff. 1-1-22; 103-555, eff. 1-1-24.) 24    (35 ILCS 200/21-302 new)25    Sec. 21-302. Payments of surplus equity.   HB3146- 9 -LRB104 11225 HLH 21307 b1    (a) Any owner of property sold under any provision of this 2Code who sustains loss or damage by reason of the issuance of a 3tax deed shall have the right to recover surplus equity that 4was lost in the property through an award of indemnity as 5follows:6        (1) The claim for indemnity shall be filed not later 7    than 2 years from the date the order directing the 8    issuance of tax deed was entered, or 2 years from the 9    effective date of this amendatory Act of the 104th General 10    Assembly, whichever is earlier.11        (2) The indemnity award shall be limited to the fair 12    cash value of the property as of the date the tax deed was 13    issued, less any mortgages or liens on the property. The 14    Court shall liberally construe this equitable entitlement 15    standard to provide compensation wherever, in the 16    discretion of the Court, the equities warrant the action.17        (3) In determining the fair cash value of property 18    less any mortgages or liens on the property, the fair cash 19    value shall be reduced by the principal amount of all 20    taxes paid by the tax purchaser or his or her assignee 21    before the issuance of the tax deed. The court, in its 22    discretion, may order the joinder of the mortgagee or 23    lienholder as an additional party to the indemnity action.24    (b) The provisions of the Code of Civil Procedure shall 25apply to proceedings under the petition, except that neither 26the petitioner nor County Treasurer shall be entitled to trial   HB3146- 10 -LRB104 11225 HLH 21307 b1by jury on the issues presented in the petition.2    (c) Any contract involving the proceeds of a judgment for 3indemnity under this Section, between the tax deed grantee or 4its successors in title and the indemnity petitioner or his or 5her successors, shall be in writing. In any action brought 6under Section 21-305, the Collector shall be entitled to 7discovery regarding, but not limited to, the following:8        (1) the identity of all persons beneficially 9    interested in the contract, directly or indirectly, 10    including at least the following information: the names 11    and addresses of any natural persons; the place of 12    incorporation of any corporation and the names and 13    addresses of its shareholders unless it is publicly held; 14    the names and addresses of all general and limited 15    partners of any partnership; the names and addresses of 16    all persons having an ownership interest in any entity 17    doing business under an assumed name and the county in 18    which the assumed business name is registered; and the 19    nature and extent of the interest in the contract of each 20    person identified;21        (2) the time period during which the contract was 22    negotiated and agreed upon, from the date of the first 23    direct or indirect contact between any of the contracting 24    parties to the date of its execution;25        (3) the name and address of each natural person who 26    took part in negotiating the contract, and the identity   HB3146- 11 -LRB104 11225 HLH 21307 b1    and relationship of the party that the person represented 2    in the negotiations; and3        (4) the existence of an agreement for payment of 4    attorney's fees by or on behalf of each party. Any 5    information disclosed during discovery may be subject to 6    protective order as deemed appropriate by the court. The 7    terms of the contract shall not be used as evidence of 8    value. 9    (35 ILCS 200/22-10)10    Sec. 22-10. Notice of expiration of period of redemption. 11A purchaser or assignee shall not be entitled to a tax deed to 12the property sold unless, not less than 3 months nor more than 136 months prior to the expiration of the period of redemption, 14he or she gives notice of the sale and the date of expiration 15of the period of redemption to the owners, occupants, the 16municipality in which the subject property lies, or the county 17if the property lies outside of municipal corporate 18boundaries, and parties interested in the property, including 19any mortgagee of record, as provided below. For counties or 20taxing districts holding certificates pursuant to Section 2121-90, the date of expiration of the period of redemption 22shall be designated by the county or taxing district in its 23petition for tax deed and identified in the notice below, 24which shall be filed with the county clerk.25    The Notice to be given to the parties shall be in at least   HB3146- 12 -LRB104 11225 HLH 21307 b110-point type in the following form completely filled in:2TAX DEED NO. .................... FILED ....................3TAKE NOTICE4    County of ...........................................5    Date Premises Sold or Forfeited .....................6    Certificate No. .....................................7    Sold or Forfeited for General Taxes of (year) .......8    Sold for Special Assessment of (Municipality)9    and special assessment number .......................10    Warrant No. ................ Inst. No. .................11THIS PROPERTY HAS BEEN SOLD FOR12DELINQUENT TAXES13Property Address (as identified on the most recent tax bill, 14if available) ....15Legal Description or Property Index No. ..........16..........17..............................18    This notice is to advise you that the above property has 19been sold for delinquent taxes and that the period of 20redemption from the sale will expire on ..........21..........22    Check with the county clerk as to the exact amount you owe 23before redeeming.24    This notice is also to advise you that a petition has been 25filed for a tax deed which will transfer title and the right to 26possession of this property if redemption is not made on or   HB3146- 13 -LRB104 11225 HLH 21307 b1before ..................................................2    This matter is set for hearing in the Circuit Court of this 3county in ...., Illinois on .....4    You may be present at this hearing but your right to redeem 5will already have expired at that time.6YOU ARE URGED TO REDEEM IMMEDIATELY7TO PREVENT LOSS OF PROPERTY8    Redemption can be made at any time on or before .... by 9applying to the County Clerk of ...., County, Illinois at the 10Office of the County Clerk in ...., Illinois.11    For further information contact the County Clerk12ADDRESS:.................... 13TELEPHONE AND/OR EMAIL ADDRESS:..................  14..........................15Purchaser or Assignee. 16Dated (insert date).  17    In counties with 3,000,000 or more inhabitants, the notice 18shall also state the address, room number, and time at which 19the matter is set for hearing.20    The changes to this Section made by Public Act 97-557 21apply only to matters in which a petition for tax deed is filed 22on or after July 1, 2012 (the effective date of Public Act 2397-557). 24    The changes to this Section made by Public Act 102-1003   HB3146- 14 -LRB104 11225 HLH 21307 b1apply to matters in which a petition for tax deed is filed on 2or after May 27, 2022 (the effective date of Public Act 3102-1003). Failure of any party or any public official to 4comply with the changes made to this Section by Public Act 5102-528 does not invalidate any tax deed issued prior to May 627, 2022 (the effective date of Public Act 102-1003). 7    The changes made to this Section by this amendatory Act of 8the 103rd General Assembly apply to matters concerning tax 9certificates issued on or after the effective date of this 10amendatory Act of the 103rd General Assembly. 11(Source: P.A. 102-528, eff. 1-1-22; 102-813, eff. 5-13-22; 12102-1003, eff. 5-27-22; 103-154, eff. 6-30-23; 103-555, eff. 131-1-24.) 14    (35 ILCS 200/22-40)15    Sec. 22-40. Issuance of order authorizing judicial tax 16deed auction, confirmation and order for tax deed; possession. 17    (a) To obtain an order authorizing a judicial tax deed 18auction and for issuance of tax deed, the petitioner must 19provide sufficient evidence that:20        (1) the redemption period has expired and the property 21    has not been redeemed; 22        (2) all taxes and special assessments which became due 23    and payable subsequent to the sale have been paid, unless 24    the county or its agent, as trustee pursuant to Section 25    21-90, is the petitioner;   HB3146- 15 -LRB104 11225 HLH 21307 b1        (3) all forfeitures and sales which occur subsequent 2    to the sale are paid or redeemed, unless the county or its 3    agent, as trustee pursuant to Section 21-90, is the 4    petitioner; 5        (4) the notices required by law have been given, and 6    all advancements of public funds under the police power 7    made by a county, city, village, or town under Section 8    22-35 have been paid; and 9        (5) the petitioner has complied with all the 10    provisions of law entitling him or her to a deed. 11    Upon receipt of sufficient evidence of the requirements 12under this subsection (a), the court shall find that the 13petitioner complied with those requirements and shall enter an 14order authorizing a judicial tax deed auction subject to the 15requirements of this Section, or subject to the requirements 16in Section 21-90 directing the county clerk, on the production 17of the tax certificate and a certified copy of the order, to 18issue to the purchaser or its assignee a tax deed. The court 19shall insist on strict compliance with Sections Section 22-10 20through 22-25. Prior to the entry of an order under this 21Section directing the issuance of a tax deed, the petitioner 22shall furnish the court with a report of proceedings of the 23evidence received on the application for tax deed. Petitioner 24shall also furnish to the court an estimate of redemption from 25the county clerk showing the of the total taxes, penalties, 26and costs that were required to be paid to redeem the tax sale   HB3146- 16 -LRB104 11225 HLH 21307 b1as specified in the notice required under Section 22-10. The 2petitioner for tax deed may file a statement of (i) all taxes 3it has paid or redeemed for the property after the expiration 4of the redemption period, (ii) the costs paid for a court 5reporter and transcript services, (iii) the fees paid to the 6clerk for the estimate of redemption, (iv) all payments made 7for municipal advancements required by Section 22-35, and (v) 8costs incurred pursuant to subsection (c) of Section 21-90. 9The total of the amount shown on the estimate of redemption as 10of the last day to redeem plus (i) through (v) above, or 11portion thereof, plus a fee of equal to the then-allowable 12foreclosure attorney fees for Illinois as published by Fannie 13Mae, plus the cost of publication of the judicial tax deed 14auction, shall be identified as the tax deed judgment amount. 15The tax deed judgment amount shall accrue interest at 0.75% 16per month, or portion thereof, from the date of the judgment 17until the date of judicial tax deed auction. The order for 18judicial tax deed auction shall include such terms and 19conditions of the auction as specified by the court and the 20report of proceedings shall be filed and made a part of the 21court record.22    (b) Except as provided in subsection (e) of this Section, 23if taxes for years prior to the year or years sold are or 24become delinquent subsequent to the date of sale, the court 25shall find that the lien of those delinquent taxes has been or 26will be merged into the tax deed grantee's title if the court   HB3146- 17 -LRB104 11225 HLH 21307 b1determines that the tax deed grantee or any prior holder of the 2certificate of purchase, or any person or entity under common 3ownership or control with any such grantee or prior holder of 4the certificate of purchase, was at no time the holder of any 5certificate of purchase for the years sought to be merged. If 6delinquent taxes are merged into the tax deed pursuant to this 7subsection, the court shall enter an order declaring which 8specific taxes have been or will be merged into the tax deed 9title and directing the county treasurer and county clerk to 10reflect that declaration in the warrant and judgment records; 11provided, that no such order shall be effective until a tax 12deed has been issued and timely recorded. Nothing contained in 13this Section shall relieve any owner liable for delinquent 14property taxes under this Code from the payment of the taxes 15that have been merged into the title upon issuance of the tax 16deed.17    (c) The county clerk is entitled to a fee of $10 in 18counties of 3,000,000 or more inhabitants and $5 in counties 19with less than 3,000,000 inhabitants for the issuance of the 20tax deed, with the exception of deeds issued to the county 21pursuant to its authority under Section 21-90. The fee paid to 22the county clerk for the issuance of the tax deed shall be 23accompanied by a $300 indemnity fund fee in counties of 243,000,000 or more inhabitants and a $100 indemnity fund fee in 25counties with less than 3,000,000 inhabitants, with the 26exception of deeds issued to the county pursuant to its   HB3146- 18 -LRB104 11225 HLH 21307 b1authority under Section 21-90. All fees received under this 2subsection shall be paid by the county clerk to the county 3treasurer of the county in which the land is situated for the 4purpose of funding the county's indemnity fund established 5under Section 21-295. The clerk may not include in a tax deed 6more than one property as listed, assessed and sold in one 7description, except in cases where several properties are 8owned by one person.9    Upon application, the court shall, enter an order to place 10the tax deed grantee or the grantee's successor in interest in 11possession of the property and may enter orders and grant 12relief as may be necessary or desirable to maintain the 13grantee or the grantee's successor in interest in possession.14    (d) The court shall retain jurisdiction to enter orders 15pursuant to subsections (b) and (c) of this Section. This 16amendatory Act of the 92nd General Assembly and this 17amendatory Act of the 95th General Assembly shall be construed 18as being declarative of existing law and not as a new 19enactment.20    (e) Prior to the issuance of any order for judicial tax 21deed auction under this Section, the petitioner must redeem 22all taxes and special assessments on the property that are 23subsequent to the date of its tax sale subject to a pending tax 24petition filed by a county or its assignee pursuant to Section 2521-90.26    (e-5) Following the expiration of the period of   HB3146- 19 -LRB104 11225 HLH 21307 b1redemption, the petitioner's payment of (i) any subsequent tax 2and special assessment and (ii) any redemption of any sale of 3subsequent taxes or forfeiture shall be accompanied by an 4indemnity fund fee of 10% of the principal taxes and interest 5paid by the petitioner under this Section. All fees received 6under this subsection shall be paid by the collector and 7county clerk to the county treasurer of the county in which the 8land is situated for the purpose of funding the county's 9indemnity fund established by Section 21-295. No fees incurred 10under this subsection shall be posted to the subject tax sale 11pursuant to Section 21-355. 12    (f) If, for any reason, a purchaser fails to obtain an 13order for tax deed within the required time period and no sale 14in error was granted or redemption paid, then the certificate 15shall be forfeited to the county, as trustee, pursuant to 16Section 21-90. 17    (g) Except as provided in Section 21-90, upon entry of an 18order requiring a judicial tax deed auction under subsection 19(a) of this Section, the property shall be offered for sale by 20public auction and sold to the highest bidder at such an 21auction in accordance with the following minimum standards and 22subject to additional requirements set by the court's order:23        (1) The tax deed petitioner, its assignee, or a duly 24    appointed private selling officer, shall give notice of 25    the auction with the following information:26            (A) the Property Identification Number and Address   HB3146- 20 -LRB104 11225 HLH 21307 b1        listed on the most recent tax bill;2            (B) the time and place of the auction;3            (C) the terms of the auction; and4            (D) the amount of the tax deed judgment amount 5        provided in Section 22-40.6        The Notice of Tax Deed Auction shall be mailed via 7    first class mail to all interested parties at the address 8    at which service of the Section 22-10 Take Notice was 9    attempted and to any parties who have appeared in the 10    proceeding. The notice shall include a sworn certificate 11    of service signed by the party sending the notice 12    attesting to the fact that the notice of auction was 13    placed in the mail at least 10 calendar days prior to the 14    date of the auction.15        The notice of auction shall be published at least 3 16    consecutive calendar weeks (Sunday through Saturday), once 17    in each week, the first such notice to be published not 18    more than 45 days prior to the auction, the last such 19    notice to be published not less than 7 days prior to the 20    auction. If the property is located in a municipality in a 21    county with less than 3,000,000 inhabitants, the purchaser 22    or his or her assignee shall also publish a notice as to 23    the owner or party interested, in some newspaper published 24    in the municipality. If the petitioner cannot identify a 25    newspaper published in the municipality, or if the 26    property is located in a county with 3,000,000 or more   HB3146- 21 -LRB104 11225 HLH 21307 b1    inhabitants, the notice shall be published in a newspaper 2    published within the county. If no newspaper is published 3    in the county, then the notice shall be published in the 4    newspaper that is published nearest the county seat of the 5    county in which the property is located. The publication 6    shall include all information included in the notice sent 7    pursuant to this Section.8        (2) The selling officer shall start all bidding with a 9    minimum bid equal to (1) the tax deed judgment amount plus 10    interest at the rate of 0.75% per month, or portion 11    thereof, for each month since the date of judgment, (2) 12    the cost for the publication of the judicial sale required 13    in this Section; and (3) the costs of the selling officer. 14    The selling officer shall proceed to a public auction, 15    offer the real estate for sale, and sell the real estate to 16    the highest bidder. If no bidder is willing to pay the 17    minimum bid, the tax certificate holder shall be the 18    winning bidder and entitled to a tax deed, and it shall be 19    conclusively presumed that there is no equity in the 20    property.21        (3) At the auction under this Section, the person 22    conducting the auction shall enter a bid in favor of the 23    tax certificate holder in the amount of the minimum bid 24    set forth above. Any tax deed Petitioner shall have a 25    final right of first refusal or final bid at the close of 26    the judicial tax deed judicial sale auction.  HB3146- 22 -LRB104 11225 HLH 21307 b1        (4) Upon and at the conclusion of the judicial tax 2    deed auction, the person conducting the auction shall give 3    to the purchaser a receipt of sale. The receipt shall 4    describe the real estate purchased and shall show the 5    amount bid, the total amount paid to date, and the amount 6    still to be paid therefor. An additional receipt shall be 7    given at the time of each subsequent payment. Any 8    purchaser who fails to complete the sale for failure to 9    make full payment shall forfeit to the county indemnity 10    fund any deposit already made, and the court shall order a 11    new auction of the property.12        (5) Upon payment in full of the amount bid, the person 13    conducting the sale shall issue, in duplicate, and give to 14    the purchaser a certificate of judicial tax deed sale. The 15    certificate of judicial tax deed sale shall be in a 16    recordable form, describe the real estate purchased, 17    indicate the date and place of sale and show the amount 18    paid therefor. The certificate of tax deed sale shall 19    further indicate that it is subject to confirmation by the 20    court. The certificate of sale shall be freely assignable 21    by endorsement thereon.22        (6) To the extent that the winning bid exceeds the tax 23    deed judgment amount, the selling officer shall deposit 24    the surplus funds with the treasurer of the county in 25    which the subject property lies upon the expiration of 30 26    days following confirmation of the sale. The petitioner   HB3146- 23 -LRB104 11225 HLH 21307 b1    shall send a notice to all parties entitled to the section 2    22-10 Take Notice, stating that the owner is entitled to a 3    distribution of surplus proceeds and may file a claim to 4    recover the surplus.5    (h) Confirmation of sale; Order for Issuance of Tax Deed.6        (1) The person conducting the sale shall promptly make 7    a report to the court that issued the order authorizing 8    the judicial tax deed auction, which report shall include 9    a copy of all receipts and, if any, certificate of 10    judicial tax deed sale.11        (2) Upon motion and notice in accordance with court 12    rules applicable to motions generally, which motion shall 13    not be made prior to sale, the court shall conduct a 14    hearing to confirm the sale. Unless the court finds that a 15    notice required in this Section was not issued or the sale 16    was not conducted in accordance with the order for 17    judicial tax deed auction, the court shall enter an order 18    (a) confirming the judicial tax deed sale, (b) directing 19    the county clerk to issue a tax deed in the name of the 20    holder of the certificate of judicial tax deed sale once 21    presented with a certified copy of the confirmation order 22    and original certificate of judicial tax deed sale, and 23    (c) directing the selling officer to pay to the holder of 24    the tax certificate the amount of the credit bid upon 25    surrender of the tax certificate, and to pay the selling 26    officer its fees. The order for issuance of tax deed shall   HB3146- 24 -LRB104 11225 HLH 21307 b1    contain the name, address, and telephone number of the 2    holder of the certificate of judicial tax sale for the 3    clerk to confirm the identity of the tax deed grantee.4        (3) If any sale fails to comply with the requirements 5    in this Section, any party may, by motion supported by 6    affidavit made prior to confirmation of such sale, request 7    that the court which entered the judgment set aside the 8    judicial tax deed sale. Any such party shall guarantee or 9    secure by bond a bid equal to the successful bid at the 10    judicial tax deed auction. No guarantee or bond shall be 11    required if the property is residential and the party 12    seeking to set aside the sale is the owner-occupant of the 13    property at the time the motion is filed. If the court 14    denies confirmation of the judicial tax deed sale, it 15    shall order a new judicial tax deed auction. Any 16    subsequent auction is subject to the same notice 17    requirement as the original auction.18        (4) No sale under this Section shall be held invalid 19    or be set aside because of any defect in the notice thereof 20    or in the publication of the same, or in the proceedings of 21    the officer conducting the sale.22    (i) Order to Disburse Surplus Proceeds. Upon a filing of 23motion by any interested party, the court hearing the 24underlying tax case shall set a hearing to determine whether 25an interested party is the owner of record entitled to a 26disbursement of surplus proceeds. All interested parties in   HB3146- 25 -LRB104 11225 HLH 21307 b1the underlying case shall be notified of the motion for 2disbursement of proceeds. Any party claiming to have an 3ownership interest in the parcel at the time of the issuance of 4tax deed may present evidence of ownership and request a 5disbursement of any or all surplus proceeds. The court shall 6issue an order directing the treasurer to disburse a specific 7amount of surplus proceeds to specific parties, with 8sufficient personally identifiable information to accurately 9identify the parties entitled to disbursement. 10(Source: P.A. 103-555, eff. 1-1-24; revised 8-5-24.) 11    (35 ILCS 200/22-65)12    Sec. 22-65. Form of deed. A tax deed executed by the county 13clerk under the official seal of the county shall be recorded 14in the same manner as other conveyances of property, and vests 15in the grantee, his or her heirs and assigns, the title of the 16property therein described without further acknowledgment or 17evidence of the conveyance. Tax deeds issued under this 18Section shall not require a municipal transfer stamp or be 19subject to any municipal real estate transfer taxes, 20requirements or certifications prior to recording. The 21conveyance shall be substantially in the following form:22State of Illinois) 23                 ) ss. 24County of .......)25    At a public sale of property for the nonpayment of taxes,   HB3146- 26 -LRB104 11225 HLH 21307 b1held in the county above stated, on (insert date), the 2following described property was sold: (here place description 3of property conveyed). The property not having been redeemed 4from the sale, and it appearing that the holder of the 5certificate of purchase of the property has complied with the 6laws of the State of Illinois necessary to entitle (insert 7him, her or them) to a deed of the property: I ...., county 8clerk of the county of ...., in consideration of the property 9and by virtue of the statutes of the State of Illinois in such 10cases provided, grant and convey to ...., his or her heirs and 11assigns forever, the property described above.12    Dated (insert date).13Signature of .................. County Clerk14Seal of County of ...., Illinois15(Source: P.A. 91-357, eff. 7-29-99.) 16    Section 10. The Mortgage Rescue Fraud Act is amended by 17changing Sections 5 and 30 as follows: 18    (765 ILCS 940/5)19    Sec. 5. Definitions. As used in this Act:20    "Distressed property" means residential real property 21consisting of one to 6 family dwelling units that is in 22foreclosure or at risk of loss due to nonpayment of taxes, or 23whose owner is more than 30 days delinquent on any loan that is 24secured by the property.  HB3146- 27 -LRB104 11225 HLH 21307 b1    "Distressed property consultant" means any person who, 2directly or indirectly, for compensation from the owner, makes 3any solicitation, representation, or offer to perform or who, 4for compensation from the owner, performs any service that the 5person represents will in any manner do any of the following:6        (1) stop or postpone the foreclosure sale or stop or 7    postpone the loss of the home due to nonpayment of taxes;8        (2) obtain any forbearance from any beneficiary or 9    mortgagee, or relief with respect to a tax sale of the 10    property;11        (3) assist the owner to exercise any right of 12    reinstatement or right of redemption;13        (4) obtain any extension of the period within which 14    the owner may reinstate the owner's rights with respect to 15    the property;16        (5) obtain any waiver of an acceleration clause 17    contained in any promissory note or contract secured by a 18    mortgage on a distressed property or contained in the 19    mortgage;20        (6) assist the owner in foreclosure, loan default, or 21    post-tax sale redemption period to obtain a loan or 22    advance of funds;23        (7) avoid or ameliorate the impairment of the owner's 24    credit resulting from the recording of a notice of default 25    or the conduct of a foreclosure sale or tax sale; or26        (8) save the owner's residence from foreclosure or   HB3146- 28 -LRB104 11225 HLH 21307 b1    save the owner from loss of home due to nonpayment of 2    taxes.3    A "distressed property consultant" does not include any of 4the following:5        (1) a person or the person's authorized agent acting 6    under the express authority or written approval of the 7    Department of Housing and Urban Development;8        (2) a person who holds or is owed an obligation 9    secured by a lien on any distressed property, or a person 10    acting under the express authorization or written approval 11    of such person, when the person performs services in 12    connection with the obligation or lien, if the obligation 13    or lien did not arise as the result of or as part of a 14    proposed distressed property conveyance;15        (3) banks, savings banks, savings and loan 16    associations, credit unions, and insurance companies 17    organized, chartered, or holding a certificate of 18    authority to do business under the laws of this State or 19    any other state or under the laws of the United States;20        (4) attorneys licensed in Illinois engaged in the 21    practice of law;22        (5) a Department of Housing and Urban Development 23    approved mortgagee and any subsidiary or affiliate of 24    these persons or entities, and any agent or employee of 25    these persons or entities, while engaged in the business 26    of these persons or entities;   HB3146- 29 -LRB104 11225 HLH 21307 b1        (6) a 501(c)(3) nonprofit agency or organization, 2    doing business for no less than 5 years, that offers 3    counseling or advice to an owner of a distressed property, 4    if they do not contract for services with for-profit 5    lenders or distressed property purchasers, or any person 6    who structures or plans such a transaction;7        (7) (blank);8        (8) licensees of the Consumer Installment Loan Act who 9    are authorized to make loans secured by real property; or10        (9) licensees of the Real Estate License Act of 2000 11    when providing licensed activities.12    "Distressed property purchaser" means any person who 13solicits an owner of distressed property and acquires any 14interest in fee in a distressed property or a beneficial 15interest in a trust holding title to a distressed property 16while allowing the owner to possess, occupy, or retain any 17present or future interest in fee in the property, or any 18person who participates in a joint venture or joint enterprise 19involving a distressed property conveyance. "Distressed 20property purchaser" does not mean any person who acquires 21distressed property at a short sale or any person acting in 22participation with any person who acquires distressed property 23at a short sale, if that person does not promise to convey an 24interest in fee back to the owner or does not give the owner an 25option to purchase the property at a later date.26    "Distressed property conveyance" means a transaction in   HB3146- 30 -LRB104 11225 HLH 21307 b1which an owner of a distressed property transfers an interest 2in fee in the distressed property or in which the holder of all 3or some part of the beneficial interest in a trust holding 4title to a distressed property transfers that interest; the 5acquirer of the property allows the owner of the distressed 6property to occupy the property; and the acquirer of the 7property or a person acting in participation with the acquirer 8of the property conveys or promises to convey an interest in 9fee back to the owner or gives the owner an option to purchase 10the property at a later date.11    "Person" means any individual, partnership, corporation, 12limited liability company, association, or other group or 13entity, however organized.14    "Service" means, without limitation, any of the following:15        (1) debt, budget, or financial counseling of any type;16        (2) receiving money for the purpose of distributing it 17    to creditors in payment or partial payment of any 18    obligation secured by a lien on a distressed property;19        (3) contacting creditors on behalf of an owner of a 20    residence that is distressed property;21        (4) arranging or attempting to arrange for an 22    extension of the period within which the owner of a 23    distressed property may cure the owner's default and 24    reinstate his or her obligation; 25        (5) arranging or attempting to arrange for any delay 26    or postponement of the time of sale of the distressed   HB3146- 31 -LRB104 11225 HLH 21307 b1    property;2        (6) advising the filing of any document or assisting 3    in any manner in the preparation of any document for 4    filing with any court; or5        (7) giving any advice, explanation, or instruction to 6    an owner of a distressed property that in any manner 7    relates to the cure of a default or forfeiture or to the 8    postponement or avoidance of sale of the distressed 9    property. 10(Source: P.A. 94-822, eff. 1-1-07; 95-691, eff. 6-1-08; 1195-1047, eff. 4-6-09.) 12    (765 ILCS 940/30)13    Sec. 30. Distressed property conveyance contract terms. 14Every contract required by Section 25 must contain the entire 15agreement of the parties, be fully assignable, and survive 16delivery of any instrument of conveyance of the distressed 17property. Every lease entered into pursuant to a contract 18required by Section 25 is terminable at will by the distressed 19property owner, without liability. Every contract required by 20Section 25 must include the following terms:21        (1) the name, business address, and the telephone 22    number of the distressed property purchaser;23        (2) the address of the distressed property;24        (3) the total consideration to be given by the 25    distressed property purchaser or tax lien payor in   HB3146- 32 -LRB104 11225 HLH 21307 b1    connection with or incident to the sale;2        (4) a complete description of the terms of payment or 3    other consideration including, but not limited to, any 4    services of any nature that the distressed property 5    purchaser represents he or she will perform for the owner 6    of the distressed property before or after the sale;7        (5) a complete description of the terms of any related 8    agreement designed to allow the owner of the distressed 9    property to remain in the home such as a rental agreement, 10    repurchase agreement, contract for deed, or lease with 11    option to buy;12        (6) a notice of cancellation as provided in this 13    Section;14        (7) the following notice in at least 12-point boldface 15    type, if the contract is printed, or in capital letters, 16    if the contract is typed, and completed with the name of 17    the distressed property purchaser, immediately above the 18    statement required by this Section:19"NOTICE REQUIRED BY ILLINOIS LAW20        Until your right to cancel this contract has ended, 21    ..................(Name) or anyone working for 22    ...................(Name) CANNOT ask you to sign or have 23    you sign any deed or any other document. You are urged to 24    have this contract reviewed by an attorney of your choice 25    within 5 business days of signing it."; and 26        (8) if title to the distressed property will be   HB3146- 33 -LRB104 11225 HLH 21307 b1    transferred in the conveyance transaction, the following 2    notice in at least 14-point boldface type if the contract 3    is printed, or in capital letters if the contract is 4    typed, and completed with the name of the distressed 5    property purchaser, immediately above the statement 6    required by this Section:7"NOTICE REQUIRED BY ILLINOIS LAW8        As part of this transaction, you are giving up title 9    to your home.".10        (9) In the case a distressed property is at risk of 11    loss for the non-payment of real estate taxes, a statement 12    that the property owner may have the right to obtain money 13    for any equity lost if a tax deed is issued, either through 14    the right to indemnity or public auction, and will lose 15    the right to claim the surplus equity if they sell the 16    property, and should consult an attorney to discuss their 17    options before selling their property. 18(Source: P.A. 94-822, eff. 1-1-07.) 19    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 20becoming law.